Georgia, session 2025_26, HB717.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 34 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
"Medical Practice Act of the State of Georgia," is amended by adding a new Code section
to read as follows:
"43-34-49.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Clinic' means a facility that offers the administration of psychedelic-assisted
treatment and therapy, including, but not limited to, intravenous infusion of ketamine.
H. B. 717
- 1 -

LC 33 9812
(2) 'Psychedelic-assisted treatment and therapy' means any treatment or therapy using
psychedelic, dissociative, or other related substances that have the potential to produce
hallucinations or rapidly induce suggestibility in the user or profound changes in
perceptions of reality or the self.
(b) No later than December 31, 2025, the board shall establish rules and regulations for the
administration of psychedelic-assisted treatment and therapy in clinics to establish
consistent standards, ensure continuing competency, and promote patient safety. Such
rules and regulations shall include requirements on:
(1) A properly equipped and maintained clinic to ensure patient safety, which may be
demonstrated by appropriate accreditation or certification;
(2) Competency of the physician using psychedelic-assisted treatment and therapy in the
absence of an anesthesiologist, anesthesia assistant, or certified registered nurse
anesthetist, including education and relevant training;
(3) Proper prescribing and ordering of psychedelic-assisted treatment and therapy;
(4) Proper administration and management of psychedelic-assisted treatment and
therapy;
(5) Emergency care and transfer protocols in the event of a complication or emergency;
(6) Maintenance of complete and accurate medical records;
(7) Reporting of adverse events to the board;
(8) Required continuing medical education; and
(9) Truth in advertising regarding the credentials, education, and training of the
individuals administering psychedelic-assisted treatment and therapy.
(c) Any physician, anesthesia assistant, or certified registered nurse anesthetist,
administering psychedelic-assisted treatment and therapy in a clinic shall be subject to the
rules and regulations established by the board pursuant to this Code section. The board
may establish minimum standards of continuing medical education for all physicians
owning a clinic. All other licensed healthcare professionals practicing in a clinic may be
H. B. 717
- 2 -

LC 33 9812
subject to minimum standards of continuing education established by the respective
licensing board for such healthcare professional.
(d)(1) On and after July 1, 2026, all clinics shall be licensed by the board and shall
biennially renew their license with the board. In the event that physicians in a clinic
practice at more than one location, each such location shall be licensed by the board, and
such license shall be nontransferable.
(2) Upon the filing of an application for a license, the board may cause a thorough
investigation of the applicant to be made and such investigation may include a criminal
background check; provided, however, that the board shall cause a thorough investigation
of a new applicant to be made, and such investigation shall include a background check.
If satisfied that the applicant possesses the necessary qualifications, the board shall issue
a license. However, the board may issue licenses with varying restrictions to such
persons where the board deems it necessary for the purpose of safeguarding the public
health, safety, and welfare.
(3) Whenever an applicable rule requires or prohibits action by a clinic, responsibility
shall be that of the owner and the physicians practicing in such clinic, whether the owner
is a sole proprietor, partnership, association, corporation, or otherwise.
(4) The board shall deny or refuse to renew a clinic license if it determines that the
granting or renewing of such license would not be in the public interest.
(5) A clinic shall be owned by physicians licensed in this state who meet the competency
requirements for psychedelic-assisted treatment and therapy established by the board and
who maintain advanced airway management training.
(6) All licenses shall expire biennially unless renewed. All applications for renewal of
a license shall be filed with the board prior to the expiration date, accompanied by the
biennial renewal fee prescribed by the board. A license which has expired for failure of
the holder to renew may be late renewed after application and payment of the prescribed
late renewal fee within the time period established by the board and provided the
H. B. 717
- 3 -

LC 33 9812
applicant meets such requirements as the board may establish by rule. Any license which
has not been renewed by the end of the late renewal period shall be considered revoked
and subject to reinstatement at the discretion of the board after meeting such requirements
as the board may establish.
(e) Administration of psychedelic-assisted treatment and therapy in a clinic shall only be
performed by:
(1) A physician licensed in this state with advanced airway management training;
(2) A certified registered nurse anesthetist licensed in this state under the direction and
responsibility of a duly licensed physician; or
(3) An anesthesia assistant licensed in this state under the direct supervision of a duly
licensed physician.
(f) A review of the prescription drug monitoring program database established pursuant
to Code Section 16-13-57 shall be completed for each patient and documented in the
patient's medical record prior to the administration of any psychedelic-assisted treatment
and therapy and all administration of any psychedelic-assisted treatment and therapy shall
be reported to the prescription drug monitoring program by the clinic.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, any person who
administers psychedelic-assisted treatment and therapy in this state without a license to
practice medicine from the board shall be deemed to be engaged in the unlawful practice
of medicine and subject to the provisions of Code Sections 43-34-39 and 43-34-42.
(h) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to permit the use of drugs or substances
not approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(i) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit the use of
psychedelic-assisted treatment and therapy in a hospital setting or in a clinical trial
approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration."
H. B. 717
- 4 -

LC 33 9812
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 717
- 5 -